Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 6 Registration of Voters

Cross references.

Exceptions to right to register and vote, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. I, Para. III.

Penalties for offenses relating to voter registration, §§

21-2-561

,

21-2-562

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3, effective January 1, 1995, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted a new article. The former article consisted of Code Sections

21-2-210

through 21-2-246 and was based on Orig. Code 1863, § 1227; Code 1868, § 1308; Code 1873, § 1281; Code 1882, § 1281; Ga. L. 1894, p. 115, §§ 2, 6-8, 10-12, 14; Ga. L. 1895, p. 115, § 3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 34, 36, 41, 42, 48-50, 52-54, 56-58, 60, 63, 64; Ga. L. 1897, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1899, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1908, p. 58, §§ 1, 4-10; Civil Code 1910, §§ 36, 38, 41, 42, 49, 50, 52, 54-56, 58, 59, 61, 63-66, 68, 70, 71, 73, 74; Ga. L. 1911, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 1913, p. 115, §§ 1, 3; Code 1933, §§ 34-103, 34-106 - 34-108, 34-115, 34-203, 34-204, 34-301, 34-303, 34-401, 34-402, 34-404, 34-405, 34-407, 34-408, 34-602 - 34-605, 34-801, 34-803, 34-804, 34-1001, 34-1101; Ga. L. 1943, p. 353, § 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1204, §§ 6-11, 13-20, 23, 24, 26, 28-36, 39, 41, 42, 45, 48, 53, 54; Ga. L. 1950, p. 126, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 344, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 385, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 269, §§ 2-8, 10-17, 20-31, 33, 35, 36, 39, 41, 43, 44; Ga. L. 1959, p. 182, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 955, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 162, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 164, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 73, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 34-601 - 34-607, 34-609 - 34-617, 34-619 - 34-636; Ga. L. 1968, p. 847, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, §§ 1-4, 4a; Ga. L. 1969, p. 285, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, §§ 5a, 7; Ga. L. 1970, p. 383, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 270, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, Ex. Sess., p. 61, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1974, p. 95, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 803, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 457, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1976, p. 468, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 473, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-626.1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, §§ 6-13, 24, 36; Code 1933, § 34-608; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1023, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1035, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 962, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1080, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1256, §§ 1, 6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1238, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1798, §§ 1-3; Code 1981, §§

21-2-210

- 21-246; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1982, p. 442, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 688, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 850, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1292, §§ 3-7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, §§ 21-23; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 786, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, §§ 2-5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 635, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 677, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 694, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 922, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1372, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1430, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1490, §§ 1, 2; Code 1981, § 21-2-232.1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 206, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, §§ 7-12; Code 1981, § 21-2-232.2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 632, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1236, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1318, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 382, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 772, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 932, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1028, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 639, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 647, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 752, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 926, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 928, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 659, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 661, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 662, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 849, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1082, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 143, §§ 1, 1A, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1238, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1282, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 56, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1060, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1231, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1815, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2048, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2051, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2345, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, §§ 10-18.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval [April 15, 1994] for the purpose of authorizing the Secretary of State to design and distribute such forms and materials and to develop, procure, and install such computer hardware and software as are required under the provisions of this Act and to exercise such administrative authority as such officer deems necessary and proper for the implementation of this Act. For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective January 1, 1995.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-210.
Secretary of State deemed the chief state election official.

The Secretary of State is designated as the chief state election official to coordinate the responsibilities of this state under the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) as required by 42 U.S.C. Section 1973gg-8.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Rights as citizens, § 31-8-111.

Law reviews.

For article, “Election Emergencies: Voting in the Wake of Natural Disasters and Terrorist Attacks,” see 67 Emory L.J. 545 (2018).

For comment, “Voter Suppression Post-

Shelby

: Impacts and Issues of Voter Purge and Voter ID Laws,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 857 (2020).

21-2-211.
List of registered electors; provision of equipment to access and utilize list.

The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain a list of all eligible and qualified registered electors in this state which shall be the official list of electors for use in all elections in this state conducted under this title.

As used in this subsection, the term “equipment” shall include, but not be limited to, computer hardware; computer software; modems, controllers, and other data transmission devices; data transmission lines; scanners and other digital imaging devices; and printers.

The Secretary of State is authorized to procure and provide all of the necessary equipment to permit the county boards of registrars to access and utilize the official list of electors maintained by the Secretary of State pursuant to this Code section, provided that funds are specifically appropriated by the General Assembly for that purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-212.
County registrars; appointment; certification; term of service; vacancies; compensation and expenses of chief registrar, registrars, and other officers and employees; budget estimates.

Except in the case in which a county has a board of elections and registration, the judge of the superior court in each county or the senior judge in time of service in those counties having more than one judge shall appoint in accordance with this Code section, upon the recommendation of the grand jury of such county, not less than three nor more than five judicious, intelligent, and upright electors of such county as county registrars. The grand jury shall submit to the judge the names of a number of electors equal to twice the number of persons to be appointed and the appointment shall be made therefrom and shall be entered on the minutes of the court. When making such appointments when appropriate, the judge will designate one of the registrars as chief registrar who shall serve as such during such registrar’s term of office, and such designation shall likewise be entered on the minutes of the court. It shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court to certify the appointments and designation to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the appointments and designation, and commissions shall be issued as for county officers. When certifying such names to the Secretary of State, the clerk of the superior court shall also list the addresses of the registrars. Except in the case in which the local Act creating a county board of elections and registration specifically provides for the appointment and removal by another authority, such judge will have the right to remove one or more of such registrars at any time for cause after notice and hearing. In case of the death, resignation, or removal of a registrar, the judge shall appoint a successor who shall serve until the next grand jury convenes, at which time the grand jury shall submit to the judge the names of two judicious, intelligent, and upright electors of such county; and the judge shall make an appointment from said list, such successor to serve the unexpired term of such registrar’s predecessor in office. In the event the grand jury is in session at the time of any such death, removal, or resignation, such grand jury shall immediately submit the names of said electors to the judge for such appointment. Each such appointment or change in designation shall be entered on the minutes of the court and certified as provided in this Code section.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, appointees under this article shall serve for a term of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified, except in the event of resignation or removal as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. Their terms shall commence on July 1 and expire on June 30 four years thereafter.

The first new grand jury which convenes in each county in the year 2013 shall submit to the judge the list of names as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section. From this list, the judge shall appoint two registrars to serve two-year terms of office and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified and not more than three registrars to serve four-year terms of office and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. Thereafter, the first new grand jury which convenes in each county in each odd-numbered year shall submit to the judge a list of names equal to twice the number of registrars whose terms are to expire that year. From this list, the judge shall appoint successors to the registrars whose terms are expiring that year who shall then serve terms of office of four years and until their respective successors are selected and qualified.

Such list of names shall be submitted to the judge, who shall appoint the registrars and designate the chief registrar, as needed, prior to June 30. No appointment for a full term shall be made prior to January 1 of the year in which the appointee is to take office. If no such grand jury is convened or, if convened but failed to recommend, the judge shall appoint the registrars without the necessity of any recommendation. In the event that a registrar holds over beyond the end of the registrar’s term of office due to the failure to have a successor timely appointed and qualified, the successor shall be appointed to serve the remainder of the term of office and shall not receive a new four-year term of office.

Reserved.

The chief registrar shall be the chief administrative officer of the board of registrars and shall generally supervise and direct the administration of the affairs of the board of registrars. The chief registrar shall act as chairperson of the board of registrars and, as chief registrar, shall perform those functions normally devolving upon the chairperson. The board of registrars shall meet each month on a day selected by the chief registrar to transact the business of the board. The board shall also meet at other times as needed upon the call of the chief registrar or upon the request of two or more of the registrars. The chief registrar shall be compensated in an amount of not less than $61.00 per day for each day of service on the business of the board of registrars. The other registrars shall be compensated in an amount of not less than $48.00 per day for each day of service on the business of the board of registrars. In lieu of the per diem compensation provided for in this subsection, the chief registrar may be compensated in an amount not less than $272.00 per month and the other registrars in an amount not less than $242.00 per month. The per diem or monthly compensation, as the case may be, shall be fixed, subject to the limitations provided for in this subsection, by the governing authority of each county and shall be paid from county funds. The compensation of other officers and employees appointed and employed under this article shall be fixed by the board of registrars with the approval of the governing authority of each county and shall be paid from county funds.

If, within 90 days of the end of the term or the creation of a vacancy for a county registrar, an appointment is not made in accordance with subsection (a) of this Code section, the governing authority of the county shall appoint the county registrars in lieu of the judge of the superior court. The appointments shall be entered on the minutes of the county governing authority. The county governing authority shall designate one of the registrars as chief registrar, who shall serve as such during such registrar’s term of office. Such designation shall likewise be entered on the minutes of such governing authority. It shall be the duty of the county governing authority to certify the appointments and designation to the Secretary of State and the clerk of the superior court within 30 days after such appointments and designation. In certifying such names to the Secretary of State and the clerk of the superior court, the county governing authority shall also list the addresses of the registrars. Such registrars shall serve for the term and in the manner set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. Any registrar shall have the right to resign at any time by submitting a resignation to the clerk of the superior court. In the event of the death, resignation, or removal of any registrar, such registrar’s duties and authority as such shall terminate instantly. Successors shall be appointed as set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The board of registrars of each county shall prepare annually a budget estimate in which it shall set forth an itemized list of its expenditures for the preceding two years and an itemized estimate of the amount of money necessary to be appropriated for the ensuing year and shall submit the same at the time and in the manner and form other county budget estimates are required to be filed. No board of registrars shall take or accept any funding, grants, or gifts from any source other than from the governing authority of the county, the State of Georgia, or the federal government.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 4; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 22/HB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 7/HB 540; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 5/SB 82; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 5/HB 268; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 14/SB 202.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Reserved” for the former provisions of subsection (c), which read: “The governing authority of each municipality shall appoint registrars as necessary, and the appointments shall be entered on the minutes of such governing authority. The municipal governing authority shall designate one of the registrars as chief registrar. The chief registrar will serve as such during such registrar’s term of office, and such designation shall likewise be entered on the minutes of such governing authority. Such registrars shall serve at the pleasure of the municipal governing authority, and compensation of the registrars shall be fixed by such governing authority. Any registrar shall have the right to resign at any time by submitting a resignation to such governing authority. In the event of any such removal or resignation of a registrar, such registrar’s duties and authority as such shall terminate instantly. Successors to resigned registrars shall be appointed by the municipal governing authority. Each appointment or change in designation shall be entered on the minutes of such governing authority and certified by the governing authority. The municipal governing authority may furnish such employees and facilities as it deems necessary for the operation of the office and the affairs of the registrars”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added the last sentence of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-213.
County deputy registrars; clerical help; appointment of county officer or employee as chief deputy registrar.

The board of registrars in each county may appoint deputy registrars to aid them in the discharge of their duties. The number of deputy registrars appointed to serve shall be determined by the board of registrars. Such deputy registrars shall serve without compensation unless the governing authority of the county, by resolution, authorizes compensation. In appointing deputy registrars, the registrars shall select persons who are reasonably representative of a cross section of significantly identifiable groups of the communities or areas where they are to serve.

The board of registrars in each county may hire clerical help to assist them in their duties if the compensation required therefor has been first approved by the governing authority of the county. Such additional clerks shall be eligible to be appointed as deputy registrars for the purpose of registering voters and performing other duties as may be required, but it shall not be necessary for such clerks to be electors of the county in which employed.

In every county wherein the registrars do not maintain an office which is open and staffed during regular business hours, the registrars shall designate and appoint as chief deputy registrar a full-time county officer or employee for the purpose of registering eligible electors and performing other duties as may be required by the board of registrars. The governing authority of the county shall provide for the compensation of the chief deputy registrar in an amount not less than $349.60 per month. The name, business address, telephone number, and any other pertinent information relative to the chief deputy registrar shall be forwarded by the registrars to the Secretary of State’s office, where such information shall be maintained on file.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1159, § 16; Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 16; Ga. L. 2006, p. 568, § 10/SB 450; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1015, § 8/SB 171.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “$349.60” for “$293.29” in the second sentence of subsection (c).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for voter registration by registrars and deputy registrars, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.03.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

21-2-213.1.
Monthly contingent expense allowance for the operation of the office of the board of registrars.

In addition to any salary, fees, or expenses now or hereafter provided by law, the governing authority of each county is authorized to provide as contingent expenses for the operation of the office of the board of registrars, and payable from county funds, a monthly expense allowance for each registrar of not less than the amount fixed in the following schedule:

Population Minimum Monthly Expenses ————— ——————— 0 — 11,889 $ 100.00 11,890 — 74,999 200.00 75,000 — 249,999 300.00 250,000 — 499,999 400.00 500,000 or more 500.00

Click to view

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-213.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 902, § 17.

21-2-214.
Qualifications of registrars and deputy registrars; prohibited political activities; oath of office; privilege from arrest; duties conducted in public.

Members of the board of registrars shall be electors of this state and the county in which they serve, and any deputy registrars shall be electors of this state. All registrars shall be able to read, write, and speak the English language. Registrars and deputy registrars shall have never been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude unless such person’s civil rights have been restored and at least ten years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of another felony involving moral turpitude and shall never have been convicted of a crime involving fraud, and the appointing authority shall be authorized to investigate the applicant’s criminal history before making such appointment.

The office of a member of a county board of registrars, a deputy registrar, a member of a county or municipal board of elections or county or municipal board of elections and registration, or a member of a joint county-municipal board of elections or joint county-municipal board of elections and registration shall be vacated immediately upon such officer’s qualifying for any nomination or office to be voted for at a primary or election or qualifying for any nomination or office or qualifying to have such officer’s name placed on any primary or election ballot pursuant to Code Sections 21-2-132 and 21-2-153 or giving notice of such officer’s intention of write-in candidacy; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to a chief deputy registrar who is also an elected public officer and who seeks to qualify for reelection to the public office such chief deputy registrar is presently holding. Nothing contained in this Code section shall cause the office of a member of a county board of registrars, deputy registrar, member of a county or municipal board of elections or county or municipal board of elections and registration, or a member of a joint county-municipal board of elections or joint county-municipal board of elections and registration to be vacated upon qualifying for or having such officer’s name placed on the ballot or holding office in a political party or body or serving as a presidential elector.

No member of a county board of registrars, deputy registrar, member of a county or municipal board of elections or county or municipal board of elections and registration, or a member of a joint county-municipal board of elections or joint county-municipal board of elections and registration, while conducting the duties of such person’s office, shall engage in any political activity on behalf of a candidate, political party or body, or question, including, but not limited to, distributing campaign literature, engaging in any communication that advocates or criticizes a particular candidate, officeholder, or political party or body, and wearing badges, buttons, or clothing with partisan messages.

Before entering upon the duties of office, each registrar and deputy registrar shall take the following oath before some officer authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state:

“I do solemnly swear that I will faithfully and impartially discharge, to the best of my ability, the duties imposed upon me by law as (deputy) registrar.”

Registrars, deputy registrars, election superintendents, and poll officers shall be privileged from arrest upon days of primaries and elections, except for fraudulent misconduct of duty, felony, larceny, or breach of the peace.

The registrars shall conduct their duties in public and all hearings on the qualifications of electors shall be conducted in public.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 13; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 15; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 12/SB 92; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 6/HB 268; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 21/SB 365.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “this state and the county” for “the state and county” near the beginning of the first sentence, and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “Municipal registrars shall be registered Georgia voters and shall be able to read, write, and speak the English language.”; and deleted “or municipal” preceding “board of registrars” near the beginning of the first and second sentences of subsection (b) and near the beginning of subsection (c).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “electors of this state” for “electors of the state” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for voter registration by registrars and deputy registrars, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Registration of Electors, § 183-1-6-.03.

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

21-2-215.
Main office of board of registrars; location; business hours; additional registration places; educators to serve as deputy registrars; training; registration cards and papers.

For the purpose of taking and processing applications for registration and for the purpose of registering electors, such number of registrars or deputy registrars as shall be designated by the chief registrar shall be stationed in the main office of the board of registrars.

In those counties in which the registrars have a main office separate from other county offices, the main office shall be in the courthouse or other public building at the county site. In those counties in which the registrars do not have an office separate from other county offices, the office of the chief deputy registrar or other office designated by the board of registrars which is accessible at all times during normal business hours shall be deemed to be the main office of the board of registrars.

The main office of the board of registrars in each county shall remain open for business during regular office hours on each business day, except Saturday. The main office, or such other offices, shall be open at such designated times other than the normal business hours as shall reasonably be necessary to facilitate registration and at such other hours as will suit the convenience of the public.

The board of registrars may designate additional registration places throughout the county on a temporary or permanent basis. These additional offices for registration will have fixed hours of operation. All voter registration places shall be places open to the general public and frequented by the general public. Such places for temporary or permanent voter registration may include, but shall not be limited to, any of the following: churches, synagogues, governmentally funded and managed public housing facilities, public social agencies, public child care centers, public recreation centers, public buildings and shopping centers, multifamily apartment complexes, child care centers, and educational facilities, provided that such places are in fact open to and frequented by the general public.

Additional registration places and the hours of operation shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or in the form of a public service announcement on radio or television one or more times at least three days prior to the first day for registration.

The State Election Board shall adopt rules and regulations setting forth criteria governing the selection of voter registration places in conformity with the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section. Boards of registrars shall not adopt rules nor utilize procedures inconsistent with such rules and regulations adopted by the State Election Board; provided, however, that nothing contained in this subsection shall supersede the ultimate authority of local boards in selecting additional voter registration sites.

Each principal or assistant principal of every public or private high school, the president of every public or private college or university, the president of each state supported technical institute in this state, and the designee of such principal, assistant principal, college or university president, or state supported technical institute president shall be a deputy registrar of the county in which the school, college, university, or institute is located for the purpose of receiving voter registration applications from those qualified applicants who are enrolled students within the principal’s school or the president’s college, university, or institute or who are employed by the private high school, the school system, the college or university, or the state supported technical institute, notwithstanding the fact that such students or employees are not residents of the county in which the school, college, university, or institute is located. Such principals, assistant principals, presidents, and their designees shall inform their students and employees of the availability of such voter registration and shall provide reasonable and convenient procedures to enable such persons who are qualified applicants to register. The principal of each public or private high school, the president of each public or private college or university, and the president of each state supported technical institute are authorized to invite other deputy registrars to the school, college, university, or institute for the purpose of conducting voter registration. All such deputy registrars authorized by this subsection shall receive annual training by the board of registrars of the county in which such deputy registrar shall work.

The completed registration cards in the custody of the board of registrars and the other papers of the board of registrars shall be secured and maintained in the main office of the board of registrars, with the exception that completed registration cards may be retained temporarily at permanent additional voter registration places established under this Code section but shall be transmitted to the main office as expeditiously as possible by a registrar or deputy registrar or by United States mail. In no event shall the completed registration cards be temporarily retained beyond the end of the next business day. However, in counties in which a computer system for the electronic imaging of the entire voter registration card or the signature of the voter is operational and permits the registrars to view the signature of the voter electronically, the completed registration cards may be stored in a secure area outside of the main office of the board of registrars, provided that such cards may be retrieved within a reasonable time in the event that the actual card is needed. The electronic image of the voter’s signature may be used by the registrars in the same manner as the original signature on the voter registration card to verify absentee ballot applications, absentee ballots, petitions, and other documents which require the registrars to compare the signature of the voter on the document to the signature on the voter’s registration card.

The board of registrars shall enter into the state-wide voter registration system credit for voting by qualified electors to the Secretary of State within 60 days of a primary or election for the purpose of maintaining the list of electors and voter history.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-215

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 14; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 23/HB 244.